Arkansas, session 2025, HB1623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-16-704, concerning examinations of
applicants for a driver's license, is amended to add an additional subsection
to read as follows:
(d) An applicant who is a foreign national and certified as a
Temporary Agricultural Worker Program participant under section H-2A of the
Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. § 1160, as existing on January 1,
2025, is not required to demonstrate his or her ability to operate a motor
vehicle or to complete the skills portion of a driver's license examination
if he or she:
(1) Has an official International Driving Permit; and
(2) Presents the International Driving Permit under subdivision
(d)(1) of this section when sitting for the written portion of the driver's
license examination.
*JMB435*
02/27/2025 2:32:42 PM JMB435